Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 290 Section 1. Section 48A.7, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 48A.7 Registration in person. 3 An eligible elector may register to vote by appearing 4 personally and completing a voter registration form at the 5 office of the commissioner in the county in which the person 6 resides, at a motor vehicle driverâs license station, including 7 any county treasurerâs office that is participating in county 8 issuance of driverâs licenses under chapter 321M , or at any 9 voter registration agency. A For paper registration forms, 10 a separate voter registration form shall be signed by each 11 individual registrant. 12 Sec. 2. Section 48A.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. An eligible elector may request that a voter registration 15 form be mailed to the elector. The completed form may be 16 mailed or delivered by the registrant or the registrantâs 17 designee to the commissioner in the county where the person 18 resides or to the state commissioner of elections for a 19 program participant, as provided in section 9E.6 . A For paper 20 registration forms, a separate voter registration form shall be 21 signed by each individual registrant. 22 Sec. 3. Section 48A.18, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are 23 amended to read as follows: 24 1. Each state motor vehicle driverâs license application, 25 including any renewal application or application for a 26 nonoperatorâs identification card, submitted to the office 27 of driver services of the state department of transportation 28 shall serve as an application for voter registration unless 29 the commissioner of registration determines that the applicant 30 is not an eligible elector or the applicant declines to 31 register to vote after receiving notification under subsection 32 4A . A completed application or paper voter registration 33 form submitted to the office of driver services of the state 34 department of transportation shall be considered to update any 35 -1- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 1/ 11 H.F. 290 previous voter registration by the registrant. 1 3. Information relating to the refusal decision of an 2 applicant for a driverâs license to apply decline to register 3 to vote shall not be used for any purpose other than voter 4 registration. 5 Sec. 4. Section 48A.18, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 6 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 7 following: 8 4. a. The state voter registration commission shall 9 establish schedules by which the department of transportation 10 shall transmit to the state registrar of voters electronic 11 records containing the legal name, age, residence, and 12 citizenship information for, and the electronic signature of, 13 each person submitting an application under this section. 14 b. The state voter registration commission shall establish 15 schedules by which the state registrar of voters shall make 16 accessible or transmit electronic records and electronic 17 signatures received under paragraph âaâ to the appropriate 18 commissioner of registration. 19 c. The state voter registration commission shall establish 20 schedules by which the department of transportation shall 21 transmit any completed paper registration forms to the 22 appropriate commissioner of registration. 23 d. The state commissioner of elections shall adopt rules, 24 consistent with section 9E.6, for the registration of address 25 confidentiality program participants. 26 e. The state voter registration commission shall adopt 27 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this 28 section, including rules to establish electronic and paper 29 forms and all procedures used by the office of driver services 30 for voter registration purposes, rules to establish schedules 31 for transmission of electronic records, electronic signatures, 32 and completed paper voter registration forms, and rules and 33 forms to decline being registered to vote. 34 Sec. 5. Section 48A.18, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 35 -2- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 2/ 11 H.F. 290 following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. a. (1) Upon receiving the electronic 2 record for, and electronic signature of, a person under 3 subsection 4, the state registrar of voters shall transmit or 4 otherwise make accessible the electronic record and electronic 5 signature of the person to the commissioner of registration 6 of the county where the person resides. Upon reviewing the 7 electronic record received from the state registrar of voters, 8 along with any other relevant information, the commissioner of 9 registration shall determine if a person is an eligible elector 10 of the county. If the commissioner determines that a person is 11 an eligible elector of the county and is not registered to vote 12 in that county, the commissioner shall notify the person of the 13 separate processes to decline being registered to vote or to 14 declare a political party affiliation. 15 (2) If the person is registered to vote in the county, the 16 commissioner shall use the electronic record and information to 17 update the personâs voter registration if appropriate. 18 b. If a person notified under paragraph âaâ does not decline 19 to be registered to vote within twenty-one calendar days after 20 the commissioner of registration issues the notification, the 21 personâs electronic record and electronic signature shall 22 constitute a completed voter registration form under section 23 48A.11, and the commissioner of registration shall register the 24 person to vote in that county. The commissioner shall send an 25 acknowledgment pursuant to section 48A.26. 26 c. A commissioner of registration shall not add a person 27 subject to registration under this subsection to a voter 28 registration list until at least twenty-one calendar days 29 after the commissioner has issued notification to the person 30 as described in paragraph âaâ . 31 d. The electronic record and electronic signature, received 32 under this subsection, of a person who does not qualify 33 as an eligible elector shall not constitute a completed 34 voter registration form under section 48A.11 and such a 35 -3- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 3/ 11 H.F. 290 personâs application for a driverâs license or nonoperatorâs 1 identification card shall not be considered to be a voter 2 registration application for purposes of section 39A.2, 3 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 4 Sec. 6. Section 48A.19, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. The department of education and all 7 state offices that collect personal information sufficient 8 to complete a voter registration, as determined by the state 9 commissioner. 10 Sec. 7. Section 48A.19, subsection 4, paragraph a, 11 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 The A voter registration agency that does not collect 14 personal information sufficient to complete a voter 15 registration application shall provide a form to applicants 16 that includes all of the following: 17 Sec. 8. Section 48A.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 48A.21 Transmission of forms from agencies and driverâs 20 license stations . 21 1. The state registrar of voters shall adopt administrative 22 rules regulating the transmission of completed voter 23 registration forms from voter registration agencies and from 24 driverâs license stations, including county treasurerâs offices 25 participating in county issuance of driverâs licenses under 26 chapter 321M . All completed voter registration applications 27 in the possession of a voter registration agency , a driverâs 28 license station, or a county treasurerâs office that is 29 participating in county issuance of driverâs licenses at 5:00 30 p.m. on the last workday of each week shall be transmitted 31 to the location designated by the state registrar of voters 32 by rule. Procedures or requirements for more frequent 33 transmissions may be specified by rule. 34 2. a. The state voter registration commission shall 35 -4- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 4/ 11 H.F. 290 establish schedules by which the voter registration agencies 1 pursuant to section 48A.19 that collect personal information 2 sufficient to complete a voter registration application shall 3 transmit to the state registrar of voters electronic records 4 containing the legal name, age, residence, and citizenship 5 information for, and the electronic signature of, each person 6 providing personal information as described in this section. 7 b. The state voter registration commission shall establish 8 schedules by which the state registrar of voters shall make 9 accessible or transmit electronic records and electronic 10 signatures received under paragraph âaâ to the appropriate 11 commissioner of registration. 12 c. The state voter registration commission shall establish 13 schedules by which voter registration agencies shall transmit 14 any completed paper registration forms to the appropriate 15 commissioner of registration. 16 d. The state commissioner of elections shall adopt rules, 17 consistent with section 9E.6, for the registration of address 18 confidentiality program participants. 19 e. The state voter registration commission shall adopt 20 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this 21 section, including rules to establish electronic and paper 22 forms and all procedures used by voter registration agencies 23 for voter registration purposes, rules to establish schedules 24 for transmission of electronic records, electronic signatures, 25 and completed paper voter registration forms, and rules and 26 forms to decline being registered to vote. 27 3. a. (1) Upon receiving the electronic record for, and 28 electronic signature of, a person under subsection 2, the state 29 registrar of voters shall transmit or otherwise make accessible 30 the electronic record and electronic signature of the person to 31 the commissioner of registration of the county where the person 32 resides. Upon reviewing the electronic record received from 33 the state registrar of voters, along with any other relevant 34 information, the commissioner of registration shall determine 35 -5- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 5/ 11 H.F. 290 if a person is an eligible elector of the county. If the 1 commissioner determines that a person is an eligible elector 2 of the county and is not registered to vote in that county, the 3 commissioner shall notify the person of the separate processes 4 to decline being registered to vote or to declare a political 5 party affiliation. 6 (2) If the person is registered to vote in the county, the 7 commissioner shall use the electronic record and information to 8 update the personâs voter registration if appropriate. 9 b. If a person notified under paragraph âaâ does not decline 10 to be registered to vote within twenty-one calendar days after 11 the commissioner of registration issues the notification, the 12 personâs electronic record and electronic signature shall 13 constitute a completed voter registration form under section 14 48A.11, and the commissioner of registration shall register the 15 person to vote in that county. The commissioner shall send an 16 acknowledgment pursuant to section 48A.26. 17 c. A commissioner of registration shall not add a person 18 subject to registration under this subsection to a voter 19 registration list until at least twenty-one calendar days 20 after the commissioner has issued notification to the person 21 as described in paragraph âaâ . 22 d. The electronic record and electronic signature, received 23 under this subsection, of a person who does not qualify as 24 an eligible elector shall not constitute a completed voter 25 registration form under section 48A.11 and such a person shall 26 not be considered to have submitted a voter registration 27 application for purposes of section 39A.2, subsection 1, 28 paragraph âaâ . 29 Sec. 9. Section 48A.26, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. (1) For a voter registration form or change of 32 information in a voter registration record submitted at a 33 precinct caucus, the commissioner shall send an acknowledgment 34 within forty-five days of receipt of the form or change of 35 -6- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 6/ 11 H.F. 290 information. 1 (2) For a voter registration application or change of 2 information in a voter registration record completed pursuant 3 to section 48A.18 or 48A.19, the commissioner shall send an 4 acknowledgment within seven working days of the person being 5 registered under either section. 6 Sec. 10. Section 48A.26, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 8. An A completed voter registration application, 9 improperly transmitted under section 48A.18, subsection 10 4A, or under section 48A.21, subsection 2, or an improperly 11 addressed or delivered registration form shall be transmitted 12 or forwarded to the appropriate county commissioner of 13 registration within two working days after it is received by 14 any other official. The date of registration shall be the date 15 the completed application or registration form was received by 16 the first official. If the registration form was postmarked 17 fifteen or more days before an election and the registration 18 form was received by the first official after the close of 19 registration, the registration form shall be considered on time 20 for the election. 21 Sec. 11. Section 48A.36, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 1. Voter registration agencies and the office of driver 24 services of the state department of transportation may 25 electronically transmit registration data to the state 26 registrar of voters, who shall distribute the information, 27 electronically or otherwise, to the appropriate commissioner 28 in accordance with rules of the state voter registration 29 commission and the state registrar of voters. The office of 30 driver services of the state department of transportation and 31 voter registration agencies that collect personal information 32 sufficient to complete a voter registration application 33 shall electronically transmit registration data to the state 34 registrar of voters as required pursuant to sections 48A.18 35 -7- LSB 2034YH (4) 91 ss/ns 7/ 11 H.F. 290 and 48A.21. The state agency originating the registration 1 data shall permanently retain an electronic copy of the 2 form completed by the registrant, including the registrantâs 3 signature, and shall develop procedures for the retrieval and 4 printing of that electronic document. A printed copy of an 5 electronic registration document shall be made only upon the 6 agencyâs receipt of a court order. 7 Sec. 12. Section 331.557A, subsection 5, Code 2023, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 5. Participate in voter registration according to the 10 terms of chapter 48A , and submit completed voter registration 11 forms to the state registrar of voters appropriate county 12 commissioner of registration . 13 Sec. 13. EMERGENCY RULES. The state voter registration 14 commission, in consultation with the department of 15 transportation and voter registration agencies, may adopt 16 emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to implement the provisions 18 of this Act and the rules shall be effective immediately upon 19 filing unless a later date is specified in the rules. Any 20 rules adopted in accordance with this section shall also be 21 published as a notice of intended action as provided in section 22 17A.4. 23 Sec. 14. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 24 3, shall not apply to this Act. 25 Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE UPON ENACTMENT. This Act, being deemed 26 of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 27